Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-208
Violations; penalty.

Any person who willfully and knowingly violates any provisions of section 45-207 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor. In addition the seller shall forfeit all time-price differential paid and cancel the outstanding indebtedness.

Laws 1965, c. 267, § 5, p. 755;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 253.